Washington statutes.
RCW 43.80.150

Treasurers not responsible for funds received—Risk of loss under fiscal agent contract.

Neither the state treasurer nor the treasurer or other fiscal officer of any local government shall be held responsible for funds received by a state fiscal agent. The state fiscal agent bears the risk of loss for any funds transferred to it under the fiscal agent contract.

[ 2016 c 105 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 80 s 6.]